Hawaii statutes.
§576E-6 Request for hearing; how made.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b), any party who is aggrieved by the
proposed order of the agency may, within ten days of service of a notice
described in section 576E-5, obtain a hearing by sending a written request for
hearing to the agency at the address from which the notice was sent.

(b) In the case of a proposed order to modify
child support resulting from the agency's review of support orders, a party
aggrieved by the proposed order may request a hearing within thirty days of
service of a notice described in section 576E-5.

(c) The agency, on its own behalf, may request
a hearing after the commencement of an administrative proceeding pursuant to
section 576E-5.

(d) Notice of the hearing under this section
shall be served in accordance with section 576E-4. [L 1988, c 154, pt of §2; am
L 1990, c 176, §13; am L 1991, c 182, §2; am L 1994, c 105, §7; am L 2008, c
178, §3]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next